District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.27

Intragovernmental cooperation.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 28, 45 DCR 3747
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2401(f), 45 DCR 7193
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.27.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2001(f) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 2001(f) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2001(f) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).